Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.401

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Petitioner" means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

(2) "Respondent" means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

[ 2001 c 65 s 301.]